Nebraska, session 109, LB22.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Family Home Visitation Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Family Home Visitation Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and
(2) Home visitation program means a voluntary program carried out in
relevant settings, primarily in the homes of families with one or more
children, five years of age or younger, or pregnant persons.
Sec. 3. (1) The department shall only fund a home visitation program that
includes periodic home visits to improve the health, well-being, and self-
sufficiency of parents and their children.
(2) A home visitation program funded by the State of Nebraska shall
provide visits by nurses, social workers, and other early childhood and health
professionals or trained and supervised lay workers.
(3) A home visitation program funded by the State of Nebraska shall
accomplish one or more of the following:
(a) Improve maternal, infant, or child health outcomes including reducing
preterm births;
(b) Promote positive parenting practices;
(c) Build healthy parent and child relationships;
(d) Enhance social and emotional development;
(e) Support cognitive development;
(f) Improve the health and well-being of the family;
(g) Empower families toward economic self-sufficiency;
(h) Reduce child maltreatment and injury; and
(i) Increase school readiness.
Sec. 4. The department shall only fund an evidence-based home visitation
program. An evidence-based home visitation program:
(1) Is founded on a clear, consistent program model;
(2) Is associated with, or certified by, a national organization, an
institution of higher education, or a national or state public health
institute;
(3) Has comprehensive home visitation standards that ensure high quality
service delivery and continuous quality improvement;
(4) Follows a program manual or design that specifies the purpose,
outcomes, duration, and frequency of service;
(5) Employs well-trained and culturally competent staff;
(6) Provides continual professional development relevant to the specific
program model being delivered;
(7) Demonstrates strong links to other community-based services;
(8) Operates within an organization that ensures compliance with home
visitation standards; and
(9) Operates with fidelity to the program model.
Sec. 5. Home visitation program funds may be used for workforce purposes
and to assist the programs and individuals in receiving and maintaining
certification for home visitation providers.
Sec. 6. The Family Home Visitation Act does not apply to a program that
provides a single home visit or infrequent home visits.
Sec. 7. Families may decline home visitation program services at any
time.
Sec. 8. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the Family Home Visitation Act.
Sec. 9. (1) No later than February 15, 2026, and through February 15,
2028, the department shall submit an electronic report to the Clerk of the
Legislature. Such report shall be made available on the department's website
and shall include the following information, if available:
(a) The type and location of home visitation programs;
(b) The goals and achieved outcomes of home visitation programs;
(c) The number of families served by each home visitation program;
(d) Demographic data on the families served;
(e) The total amount of funds expended for home visitation programs;
(f) Program model descriptions and model-specific outcomes;
(g) The training and professional credentials required for each program
model;
(h) Eligibility criteria for each program model;
(i) Target populations for each program model;
-1-

LB22 LB22
2025 2025
(j) Wait list information, if applicable; and
(k) Referral sources.
(2) The department shall only include outcomes from federally funded or
state-funded home visitation programs.
Sec. 10. Section 68-911, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-911 (1) Medical assistance shall include coverage for health care and
related services as required under Title XIX of the federal Social Security
Act, including, but not limited to:
(a) Inpatient and outpatient hospital services;
(b) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(c) Nursing facility services;
(d) Home health services;
(e) Nursing services;
(f) Clinic services;
(g) Physician services;
(h) Medical and surgical services of a dentist;
(i) Nurse practitioner services;
(j) Nurse midwife services;
(k) Pregnancy-related services;
(l) Medical supplies;
(m) Mental health and substance abuse services;
(n) Early and periodic screening and diagnosis and treatment services for
children which shall include both physical and behavioral health screening,
diagnosis, and treatment services;
(o) Rural health clinic services; and
(p) Federally qualified health center services.
(2) In addition to coverage otherwise required under this section, medical
assistance may include coverage for health care and related services as
permitted but not required under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act,
including, but not limited to:
(a) Prescribed drugs;
(b) Intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental
disabilities;
(c) Home and community-based services for aged persons and persons with
disabilities;
(d) Dental services;
(e) Rehabilitation services;
(f) Personal care services;
(g) Durable medical equipment;
(h) Medical transportation services;
(i) Vision-related services;
(j) Speech therapy services;
(k) Physical therapy services;
(l) Chiropractic services;
(m) Occupational therapy services;
(n) Optometric services;
(o) Podiatric services;
(p) Hospice services;
(q) Mental health and substance abuse services;
(r) Hearing screening services for newborn and infant children; and
(s) Administrative expenses related to administrative activities,
including outreach services, provided by school districts and educational
service units to students who are eligible or potentially eligible for medical
assistance.
(3) No later than July 1, 2009, the department shall submit a state plan
amendment or waiver to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
to provide coverage under the medical assistance program for community-based
secure residential and subacute behavioral health services for all eligible
recipients, without regard to whether the recipient has been ordered by a
mental health board under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act to receive
such services.
(4) On or before October 1, 2014, the department, after consultation with
the State Department of Education, shall submit a state plan amendment to the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, as necessary, to provide
that the following are direct reimbursable services when provided by school
districts as part of an individualized education program or an individualized
family service plan: Early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment
services for children; medical transportation services; mental health services;
nursing services; occupational therapy services; personal care services;
physical therapy services; rehabilitation services; speech therapy and other
services for individuals with speech, hearing, or language disorders; and
vision-related services.
(5)(a) No later than January 1, 2023, the department shall provide
coverage for continuous glucose monitors under the medical assistance program
for all eligible recipients who have a prescription for such device.
(b) Effective August 1, 2024, eligible recipients shall include all
individuals who meet local coverage determinations, as defined in section
1869(f)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, as such act
existed on January 1, 2024, and shall include individuals with gestational
diabetes.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that no more than six hundred
thousand dollars be appropriated annually from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess
-2-

LB22 LB22
2025 2025
Profit Fund, as described in section 68-996, for the purpose of implementing
subdivision (5)(b) of this section. Any amount in excess of six hundred
thousand dollars shall be funded by the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit
Fund.
(6) On or before October 1, 2023, the department shall seek federal
approval for federal matching funds from the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services through a state plan amendment or waiver to extend postpartum
coverage for beneficiaries from sixty days to at least six months. Nothing in
this subsection shall preclude the department from submitting a state plan
amendment for twelve months.
(7)(a) No later than October 1, 2025, the department shall submit a
medicaid waiver or state plan amendment to the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services to designate two medical respite facilities to reimburse for
services provided to an individual who is:
(i) Homeless; and
(ii) An adult in the expansion population.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Adult in the expansion population means an adult (A) described in 42
U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) as such section existed on January 1, 2024, and
(B) not otherwise eligible for medicaid as a mandatory categorically needy
individual;
(ii) Homeless has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. 11302 as such
section existed on January 1, 2024;
(iii) Medical respite care means short-term housing with supportive
medical services; and
(iv) Medical respite facility means a residential facility that provides
medical respite care to homeless individuals.
(c) The department shall choose two medical respite facilities, one in a
city of the metropolitan class and one in a city of the primary class, best
able to serve homeless individuals who are adults in the expansion population.
(d) Once such waiver or state plan amendment is approved, the department
shall submit a report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature on or before November 30 each year, which provides the (i) number
of homeless individuals served at each facility, (ii) cost of the program, and
(iii) amount of reduction in health care costs due to the program's
implementation.
(e) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this subsection.
(f) The services described in subdivision (7)(a) of this section shall be
funded by the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund as described in section
68-996.
(8)(a) No later than January 1, 2025, the department shall provide
coverage for an electric personal-use breast pump for every pregnant woman
covered under the medical assistance program, or child covered under the
medical assistance program if the pregnant woman is not covered, beginning at
thirty-six weeks gestation or the child's date of birth, whichever is earlier.
The electric personal-use breast pump shall be capable of (i) sufficiently
supporting milk supply, (ii) double and single side pumping, and (iii) suction
power ranging from zero mmHg to two hundred fifty mmHg. No later than January
1, 2025, the department shall provide coverage for a minimum of ten lactation
consultation visits for every mother covered under the medical assistance
program or child covered under the medical assistance program, if the mother is
not covered under such program.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriation for
lactation consultation visits shall be equal to an amount that is a one hundred
forty-five percent rate increase over the current lactation consultation rate
paid by the department.
(9)(a) No later than January 1, 2024, the department shall provide
coverage, and reimbursement to providers, for all necessary translation and
interpretation services for eligible recipients utilizing a medical assistance
program service. The department shall take all actions necessary to maximize
federal funding to carry out this subsection.
(b) The services described in subdivision (9)(a) of this section shall be
funded by the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund as described in section
68-996.
(10)(a) No later than October 1, 2025, the department shall seek approval
for federal matching funds from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services through a state plan amendment to implement targeted case management
for evidence-based nurse home visiting services. These services shall consist
of visits to a home by a nurse and be available to postpartum mothers and
children six months of age or younger enrolled in medicaid.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to use the Medicaid Managed Care
Excess Profit Fund established in section 68-996, and not to use the General
Fund, to fund the services described in subdivision (a) of this subsection.
Sec. 11. Section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-996 (1) The Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund is created. The
fund shall contain money returned to the State Treasurer pursuant to
subdivision (3) of section 68-995.
(2) The fund shall first be used to offset any losses under subdivision
(2) of section 68-995 and then to provide for (a) services addressing the
health needs of adults and children under the Medical Assistance Act, including
filling service gaps, (b) providing system improvements, (c) providing
-3-

LB22 LB22
2025 2025
evidence-based early intervention home visitation programs, (d) providing
medical respite services, (e) translation and interpretation services, (f)
providing coverage for continuous glucose monitors as described in section
68-911, (g) providing other services sustaining access to care, (h) the
Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program, (i) and providing grants pursuant to the
Intergenerational Care Facility Incentive Grant Program, and (j) evidence-based
nurse home visiting services as determined by the Legislature. The fund shall
only be used for the purposes described in this section.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund.
Sec. 12. Original sections 68-911 and 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-